New York, session 2025-2026, S294.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The section heading, the opening paragraph of subdivision 1 2 and subdivision 2 of section 811 of the labor law, the section heading 3 and the opening paragraph of subdivision 1 as amended by chapter 482 of 4 the laws of 1961 and subdivision 2 as amended by chapter 51 of the laws 5 of 1968, are amended to read as follows: 6 Powers and duties of [industrial] the commissioner; personnel. 7 The [industrial] commissioner shall have the following powers and 8 duties: 9 2. The [industrial] commissioner shall appoint a person who shall be 10 in charge of apprentice training in the department [of labor], and who 11 shall act as secretary of the state apprenticeship and training council 12 and of state joint apprenticeship committees. The [industrial] commis- 13 sioner is further authorized to appoint such clerical, technical, and 14 professional assistants as shall be necessary to effectuate the purposes 15 of this article. The personnel appointed under this article shall 16 receive an annual compensation to be fixed by the [industrial] commis- 17 sioner within the amount provided by appropriation. 18 § 2. Paragraphs (k) and (l) of subdivision 1 of section 811 of the 19 labor law, as relettered by chapter 825 of the laws of 2021, are relet- 20 tered (l) and (m) and a new paragraph (k) is added to read as follows: 21 (k) to require such apprenticeship program is specific to the type and 22 scope of work which is being performed and have a graduation rate of at 23 least thirty percent as determined by the department. 24 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01197-01-5